Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2712
Fees and costs; amount; transmit to State Treasurer; deposited in General Fund.

Fees and costs in the county court shall be those provided by Chapter 33. Each clerk of the court shall, not later than the fifteenth day of the month following the calendar month in which they were received, transmit all such fees and costs received together with any interest or other income accumulated as a result of section 25-2713 and any fees for credit card use, reduced by any costs incurred as a result of credit card use and any other bank charges, to the State Treasurer who shall deposit the same in the General Fund.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 32;

Laws 1975, LB 286, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 326, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-532.